Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-905
Clinical nurse specialist, defined.

Clinical nurse specialist means a registered nurse certified as described in section 38-908 and licensed under the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act to practice as a clinical nurse specialist in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 257.

Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act, see section 38-201.